Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-919
Correctional officer; protective vest; required.

The Department of Correctional Services shall provide each correctional officer, as part of the standard uniform, with a protective vest designed to protect against edged weapons and stabbings. Each such vest shall be fitted to the officer.

Laws 2023, LB50, § 58.